Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1718, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1718. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority is authorized in
its discretion to file an application with the Supreme Court of
Oklahoma for the approval of any bonds to be issued hereunder, and
exclusive original jurisdiction is hereby conferred upon the Supreme
Court to hear and determine each such application. It shall be the
duty of the Court to give such applications precedence over the
other business of the Court and to consider and pass upon the
applications and any protests which may be filed thereto as speedily
as possible. Notice of the hearing on each application shall be
Req. No. 14354 Page 1

give n by a notice published in a newspaper of general circulation in
the state, as well as by certified mail to any and all real property
owners located within a one-mile radius of the specified project,
that on a day named the Authority will ask the Court to hear its
application and approve the bonds. Such notice shall inform all
persons interested that they may file protests against the issuance
of the bonds and be present at the hearing and contest the legality
thereof. Such notice shall be published one time not less than ten
(10) days prior to the date named for the hearing and the hearing
may be adjourned from time to time in the discretion of the Court.
If the Court shall be satisfied that the bonds have been properly
authorized in accordance with this article and that when issued,
they will constitute valid obligations in accordance with their
terms, the Court shall render its written opinion approving the
bonds and shall fix the time within which a petition for rehearing
may be filed. The decision of the Court shall be a judicial
determination of the validity of the bonds, shall be conclusive as
to the Authority, its officers and agents, and thereafter the bonds
so approved and the revenues pledged to their payment shall be
incontestable in any court in the State of Oklahoma.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14354 JBH 12/04/25

Req. No. 14354 Page 2